Washington statutes.
RCW 18.73.010

Legislative finding.

The legislature finds that a statewide program of emergency medical care is necessary to promote the health, safety, and welfare of the citizens of this state. The intent of the legislature is to assure minimum standards and training for first responders and emergency medical technicians, and minimum standards for ambulance services, ambulances, aid vehicles, aid services, and emergency medical equipment.

[ 1990 c 269 s 22; 1988 c 104 s 2; 1987 c 214 s 1; 1973 1st ex.s. c 208 s 1.]